Hawaii statutes.
§346-154 Criminal history checks, child
abuse record checks, and adult abuse perpetrator checks. (a) The
department shall develop standards to ensure the reputable and responsible
character of an applicant to operate a child care facility, prospective employees
of the applicant, and new employees of the provider after registration or
licensure, which shall include criminal history record checks in accordance
with section 846-2.7, child abuse record checks, and adult abuse perpetrator
checks.

For the purposes of this section, "adult
abuse perpetrator check" means a search to determine whether an individual
is known to the department as a perpetrator of abuse as defined in section
346-222, by means of a search of the individual's name and birth date in the
department's adult protective services file.

(b) An applicant to operate a child care
facility shall:

(1) Be subject to criminal history record checks in
accordance with section 846-2.7;

(2) Submit to the department under penalty of law,
statements signed by the applicant and prospective employees of the applicant
indicating whether the applicant or any of the prospective employees has ever
been confirmed to have abused or neglected a child or vulnerable adult,
including threatened harm; and

(3) Provide consent to the department to conduct a
criminal history record check in accordance with section 846-2.7, a child abuse
record check, and an adult abuse perpetrator check, and to obtain criminal
history information, child abuse record information, and adult abuse
perpetrator information for verification.

(c) A provider shall:

(1) Be subject to criminal history record checks in
accordance with section 846-2.7;

(2) Submit to the department a statement signed by
any employee hired after the initial licensure or registration that requires
the employee to indicate under penalty of law, whether the employee has ever
been confirmed to have abused or neglected a child or vulnerable adult,
including threatened harm; and

(3) Provide consent to the department or its designee
to conduct a criminal history record check in accordance with section 846-2.7,
a child abuse record check, and an adult abuse perpetrator check, and to obtain
criminal history information, child abuse record information and adult abuse
perpetrator check information for verification.

(d) The department or its designee shall
obtain criminal history record information through the Hawaii criminal justice
data center in accordance with section 846-2.7, and child abuse record
information and adult abuse perpetrator check information from the department
in accordance with departmental procedures on the applicant and any prospective
employee of the applicant, including any new employee retained after the
applicant is issued a registration or license under this part, which shall
include an annual name inquiry into the state criminal history record files.

(e) The department may deny an application for
a license or registration to operate a child care facility if:

(1) The applicant or any prospective employee has
been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation involving a fine
of $50 or less, or ever been confirmed to have abused or neglected a child or
vulnerable adult, including threatened harm; and

(2) The department finds that the criminal history or
child abuse record or adult abuse perpetrator check record of that applicant or
prospective employee indicates that the applicant or prospective employee may
pose a risk to the health, safety, or well-being of children.

(f) The department may request the provider to
terminate the employment of a new employee or may suspend or revoke the license
or registration of the provider who employs a new employee if:

(1) The employee has been convicted of a crime other
than a minor traffic violation involving a fine of $50 or less, or ever been
confirmed to have abused or neglected a child or vulnerable adult, including
threatened harm; and

(2) The department finds that the criminal history or
child abuse record or adult abuse perpetrator check record of the new employee
indicates that the new employee may pose a risk to the health, safety, or
well-being of children. [L 1985, c 208, pt of §2; am L 1986, c 297, §3; am L
2001, c 201, §4; am L 2003, c 95, §9(6); am L 2008, c 136, §4; am L 2012, c 41,
§2]

Cross References

Child placing organizations, child caring institutions, and
foster boarding homes, standards, see §346-17.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next